Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1 General Provisions
62-6-120. Penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation that engages or offers to engage in contracting without a license as required by § 62-6-103 or who violates the terms and conditions of any license or renewal granted by the board pursuant to this part commits a Class A misdemeanor. The penalties imposed by this subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply to a person who engages a contractor without a license for the purpose of constructing a residence for the use of that person.

Any person, firm or corporation that engages or offers to engage in contracting without a license as required by § 62-6-103 may, in the discretion of the board, be deemed ineligible to receive a license until six (6) months after the date the person, firm or corporation engaged or offered to engage in contracting. Additionally, no such person, firm or corporation shall be awarded any contract for the project upon which it engaged in contracting without a license or permitted to participate in any rebidding of the project.

Any person, firm or corporation that accepts a bid in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) from a contractor who is not licensed, with appropriate classifications and sufficient monetary limitations, or in the case of a limited licensed electrician where the amount is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), in accordance with this part, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

No official of the state other than of the department of transportation shall issue a permit or contract work order to any applicant for a permit or work order to engage in contracting, unless the applicant holds a license as a contractor with appropriate classifications and sufficient monetary limitations, in accordance with this part.

Any official violating this subsection (c) commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, relative to the amount of civil penalties that may be imposed, the board may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per offense against any person or firm that violates the terms and conditions of an existing license to engage in contracting or against any person or firm that engages in unlicensed contracting.

The director of the board, acting on behalf of the board, is authorized to issue citations against persons:

Acting in the capacity of or engaging in the business of a contractor without a license in violation of § 62-6-103;

Exceeding the monetary limitation on the person's contractor's license; or

Acting in the capacity of or engaging in the business of a contractor in a classification in which the person is not licensed by the board, notwithstanding the person's licensure to perform such services in another classification.

Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the basis of the citation.

Each citation shall contain an order to cease all violations of this part and an assessment of a civil penalty in an amount no less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations to specify those conditions necessary to the issuance of a citation and the range of penalties for violations of this part.

The sanctions authorized pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be in addition to any other remedies, civil and criminal, available to any person harmed by a violation of this part.

Service of a citation issued pursuant to this subsection (e) may be made by certified mail at the last known business address or residence address of the person cited.

A citation issued pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be issued by the director within one (1) year after the act or omission that is the basis for the citation.

Any person served with a citation pursuant to this subsection (e) may appeal to the director by written notice postmarked within fifteen (15) working days after service of the citation with respect to violations alleged, scope of the order or amount of civil penalty assessed.

If a person cited timely notifies the director that the person intends to contest the citation, the director shall afford an opportunity for a contested case hearing pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

After all administrative appeals have been exhausted, the director may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment in an amount of the civil penalty, plus applicable court costs, and for an order to cease activities in violation of § 62-6-103. A certified copy of the final order of the board, hearing officer, or administrative judge or a certified copy of the unappealed citation shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the director may waive part of the civil penalty if the person against whom the civil penalty is assessed satisfactorily completes all the requirements for, and is issued, a license as a general contractor.

Any outstanding injury to the public shall be settled satisfactorily before a license as a general contractor is issued.

Any individual or entity that fails to pay a civil penalty assessed by the board pursuant to the terms of a final order entered by the board after a contested case hearing against the individual or entity pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, may be referred to a collection agency.

Failure to pay any civil penalty assessed by the board shall subject the individual or entity to suspension or revocation of a license issued pursuant to this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 21; 1981, ch. 399, § 2; 1981, ch. 497, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-621; Acts 1984, ch. 888, § 4; 1986, ch. 718, § 3; 1989, ch. 487, § 15; 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 1991, ch. 247, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 986, § 14; 1999, ch. 238, § 6; 2007, ch. 460, § 6; T.C.A., § 62-6-118(e); T.C.A., §§ 62-6-201 — 62-6-207; Acts 2013, ch. 180, § 5; 2015, ch. 290, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Subsections (d) and (e) were transferred to this section from § 62-6-118(d) and from part 2 of this chapter, respectively, by the code commission in 2009.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 10, provided that the state fire marshal is hereby directed to notify by mail and by other means deemed to be reasonable all persons who are registered pursuant to § 68-102-150 on July 1, 1999. Such notification shall include the requirements of Acts 1999, ch. 238, pertaining to limited licensed electricians and the means for obtaining a license as a limited licensed electrician. Such notification shall also include a telephone number which persons needing additional information can call. Acts 1999, ch. 238 is codified in this section and §§ 62-6-102, 62-6-103, 62-6-111, 62-6-130 and 62-6-131.

Acts 2015, ch. 290, § 6 provided that the act shall apply to all civil penalties that are assessed on or after April 24, 2015.

Cross-References. Exclusion of certain contracts from definition of contracting, § 62-6-102.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary, II. Contracts (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 353.

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of separate licensure for different construction classifications, OAG 98-020, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (1/15/98).

62-6-121. Enforcement.

The board shall inquire into the identity of any person, firm or corporation operating under the general classifications of this part and shall prosecute any person, firm or corporation violating this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 22; 1978, ch. 906, § 22; T.C.A., § 62-622.

Law Reviews.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary, II. Contracts (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 353.

62-6-122. Injunctions.

In order to secure the effective enforcement of this part, jurisdiction is conferred on the chancery courts of this state to grant injunctive relief against:

Any person, firm or corporation undertaking to engage in the contracting business in violation of the terms of this part; or

Any person, firm, corporation or official of this state or any political subdivision of this state who accepts a bid in violation of § 62-6-120(b) or (c).

The injunction suit shall be filed in the name of the state of Tennessee on relation of the board for licensing contractors, or any member of the board, without bond being required for prosecution of the suit or for the issuance of injunction.

Any expenses incurred, such as depositions, travel expenses or attorney fees, required for the prosecution of the suit, shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses incurred by the board.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 23; T.C.A., § 62-623; Acts 1989, ch. 25, § 1.

Cross-References. State Construction Projects Liability Act, title 12, ch. 4, part 5.

Law Reviews.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary, II. Contracts (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 353.

62-6-123. Indemnify or hold harmless agreement invalid.

A covenant promise, agreement or understanding in or in connection with or collateral to a contract or agreement relative to the construction, alteration, repair or maintenance of a building, structure, appurtenance and appliance, including moving, demolition and excavating connected therewith, purporting to indemnify or hold harmless the promisee against liability for damages arising out of bodily injury to persons or damage to property caused by or resulting from the sole negligence of the promisee, the promisee's agents or employees or indemnitee, is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 24; T.C.A., § 62-624.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Indemnity, § 3; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 144.

62-6-124. Access to and use of financial statements.

The financial statements submitted by contractors shall be treated as confidential and shall be used by the board only for the purposes of determining the qualifications of applicants for licenses and the monetary limitations.

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designated representative shall be accorded access to and may examine any financial statement solely for the purpose of a legitimate audit, § 10-7-508 to the contrary notwithstanding.

Acts 1979, ch. 165, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-625.

Cross-References. Confidential records, § 10-7-504.

Financial statements required, § 62-6-111(b)(2).

Law Reviews.

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

62-6-125. Hearings and judicial review.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this part.

Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-626.

62-6-126. Retirement of license — Procedure — Fee — Reinstatement — Disciplinary actions — Renewal — Transferability.

Any licensee may retire the licensee's license by submitting a form prescribed by the board accompanied by the current active license certificate and a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Upon receipt of an acceptable application to retire, the board shall issue a retired inactive license certificate to the contractor. The holder of a retired license shall not be entitled to practice as a contractor until the licensee is reinstated.

Any licensee who is not engaged in work or activities that require a contractor's license may apply for a retired license.

A retired license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year from the annual renewal date. If the inactive licensee wishes to remain inactive for any portion of a subsequent calendar year, the licensee shall pay an additional inactive fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) on or before the annual renewal date of each such year.

The board shall not refund any of the renewal fee that a licensee may have paid prior to the receipt of the application to retire.

A retired license may be reinstated by submitting an application acceptable to the board, by paying the full renewal fee for an active license and by fulfilling all other requirements of this part. No examination shall be required to reinstate a retired license.

The retired status of a license shall not bar any disciplinary action by the board against a licensee for any of the causes provided in this part.

In no event may a retired license be renewed for more than seven (7) years dated from the time of initial application.

No retired license is transferable.

Acts 1991, ch. 216, § 1.

62-6-127. [Reserved.]

Notwithstanding title 66, chapter 11 or any other law to the contrary, title 66, chapter 11, shall not be available on single family residential construction to any person, firm or corporation that performs residential construction and that is required to be licensed as a contractor pursuant to this part and fails to have a valid license when acting as a contractor.

Acts 1994, ch. 986, § 16.

62-6-129. Bid bonds.

In addition to any applicable requirement of § 12-4-201, no contract for the services of a construction manager shall be awarded for any public work in this state by any city, county or state authority or any board of education unless there is posted at the time of the submittal of a proposal for services by a construction manager a bid bond equal to ten percent (10%) of the value of the services proposed and the value of the work to be managed or may at the time of contracting provide payment and performance bonds in amounts equal to the combined monetary value of the services of the construction manager and the value of the work to be so managed.

Acts 1995, ch. 342, § 1.

62-6-130. Limited licensed electricians not contractors.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to provide that a limited licensed electrician is a contractor. It is the intent of this part to provide that a limited licensed electrician is subject to the jurisdiction of the board solely for the purposes of licensure and disciplinary proceedings. No limited licensed electrician shall be authorized to use the appellation “contractor” or any other designation that gives or is designed to give the impression that a limited licensed electrician is a contractor unless the limited licensed electrician also holds a valid contractor's license issued by the board.

Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 3; 2000, ch. 876, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 10, provided that the state fire marshal is hereby directed to notify by mail and by other means deemed to be reasonable all persons who are registered pursuant to § 68-102-150 on July 1, 1999. Such notification shall include the requirements of Acts 1999, ch. 238, pertaining to limited licensed electricians and the means for obtaining a license as a limited licensed electrician. Such notification shall also include a telephone number which persons needing additional information can call. Acts 1999, ch. 238 is codified in this section and §§ 62-6-102, 62-6-103, 62-6-111, 62-6-120, and 62-6-131.

62-6-131. Bonds — Expiration of licenses — Fees.

No person shall be required to post a bond, provide a financial statement or provide a letter of reference in order to obtain a license as a limited licensed electrician.

All limited licensed electrician licenses shall expire biennially on the month of their issuance.

The board shall prescribe fees for the issuance and renewal of licenses of limited licensed electricians. The fees, together with the fees prescribed for limited licensed plumbers pursuant to chapter 6, part 4 of this title, shall be in an amount that provides for the cost of administering the licensing and regulation of limited licensed electricians and limited licensed plumbers.

The fees collected by the board as described in subdivision (c)(1) shall be combined with fees collected for the licensing of limited licensed plumbers, pursuant to chapter 6, part 4 of this title. These fees shall be used to defray expenses incurred in the administration of the licensing of limited licensed electricians, pursuant to this part, and limited licensed plumbers, pursuant to chapter 6, part 4 of this title.

Fees for limited licensed electricians shall be adjusted as necessary to provide that the limited licensed electricians and plumbers fund is fiscally self-sufficient and that revenues from fees do not exceed necessary and required expenditures.

On July 1, 2015, all funds held by the state treasurer for the administration of the licensing of limited licensed electricians shall be combined with funds held for the administration of the licensing of limited licensed plumbers, pursuant to chapter 6, part 4 of this title.

In no event shall the fee for an initial limited licensed electrician license exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per year nor shall the fee for a renewal of the license exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per year.

Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 9; 2000, ch. 876, § 13; 2015, ch. 291, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 10, provided that the state fire marshal is hereby directed to notify by mail and by other means deemed to be reasonable all persons who are registered pursuant to § 68-102-150 on July 1, 1999. Such notification shall include the requirements of Acts 1999, ch. 238, pertaining to limited licensed electricians and the means for obtaining a license as a limited licensed electrician. Such notification shall also include a telephone number which persons needing additional information can call. Acts 1999, ch. 238, is codified in this section and §§ 62-6-102, 62-6-103, 62-6-111, 62-6-120 and 62-6-130.

62-6-132. Inspection of temporary electrical service.

No person is required to register with the state fire marshal nor obtain a license from the board for licensing contractors to inspect temporary electrical service.

Acts 2000, ch. 876, § 14.

62-6-133. Acts prohibited by residential contractor — Conflicts of interest.

The following acts are prohibited by a residential contractor:

Having a controlling ownership interest in the lender providing a mortgage loan for home improvement for the work being performed by the contractor; or

Being a cosigner or acting as a guarantor for a mortgage loan for home improvement.

As used in this section, “mortgage loan for home improvement” shall have the same meaning as defined in § 45-13-403(c).

Acts 2003, ch. 368, § 3.

62-6-134. Violations by residential contractors — Penalties.

For each violation of § 62-6-133 by a residential contractor, the board is authorized to impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) after notice and an opportunity for a hearing. The penalty shall be in addition to any other penalty authorized pursuant to this part.

In addition to the civil penalty authorized pursuant to subsection (a), a violation of § 62-6-133 shall be construed to constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting the conduct of trade or commerce under the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1; and, as such, the private right of action remedy under the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977 shall be available to any person who suffers an ascertainable loss of money or property, real, personal or mixed, or any other article, commodity or thing of value wherever situated as a result of the violation.

Acts 2003, ch. 368, § 3.

62-6-135. Applicability to alarm systems contractors.

This part shall not apply to entities certified under chapter 32, part 3, of this title, when those entities are performing functions for which those entities are certified.

Acts 2003, ch. 68, § 1.

62-6-136. Unlawful representation as a licensed contractor or acting as a contractor — Penalties — Liability.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to represent itself as a licensed contractor or to act in the capacity of a “contractor” as defined in §§ 62-6-102, or 62-37-103 [repealed], and related rules and regulations of this state, or any similar statutes, rules and regulations of another state, while not licensed, unless such person, firm or corporation has been duly licensed under § 62-6-103 or [former] § 62-37-104 [repealed].

In addition to the penalties set out in § 62-6-120, [former] § 62-37-114 [repealed] or [former] § 62-37-127 [repealed], a violation of this section shall be construed to constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting the conduct of trade or commerce under the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1; and, as such, the private right of action remedy under the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977 shall be available to any person who suffers an ascertainable loss of money or property, real, personal or mixed, or any other article, commodity or thing of value wherever situated as a result of the violation.

An individual who violates this section and would, but for this section, have limited liability as owner of an entity having limited liability protection, including, but not limited to, a corporation, is personally liable for the individual's own representations, acts or omissions to the same extent as if that individual rendered the representations, acts or omissions as an individual.

Acts 2004, ch. 492, § 2.

Compiler's note.

Chapter 37 of this title, several sections of which are referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 460, § 1, effective July 1, 2007. Provisions regarding home improvement contractors are now in chapter 6, part 5.

62-6-137. Registration with the department of codes administration or other appropriate department — Posting of permit bonds.

It shall be the duty of every person who makes contracts described in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4), and every person, making such contracts or subletting such contracts, or any part of the contracts, to register with the department of codes administration or other appropriate departments and to post a permit bond in the amount set forth in this section:

For the construction, erection, alteration, repair, removal or demolition of any building or structure or part of any building or structure;

For repair or replacement of any damage to a building or structure caused by insects or natural disasters;

To erect or construct any sign, billboard or similar structure or to construct any public or private swimming pool; or

To do or perform any work for which a permit is required.

For building permits under twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the bond amount shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

For all building permits of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and larger, the bond amount shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

For all gas/mechanical, plumbing and excavation permits, the bond amount shall be forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

The bond required by this section shall be a permit bond conditioned to conform to the requirements of this section and to all applicable laws, ordinances, rules and regulations of the municipality or county relating to work that is performed by the principal pursuant to a permit issued under this bond or for work performed by the principal for which a permit should have been obtained prior to commencement of the activity, and to indemnify the municipality or county and property owners against any and all loss suffered by them by reason of the failure of the contractor to comply with the laws, ordinances, rules and regulations. The bond shall be continuous and may not be cancelled without at least a ten-day prior notice in writing to the director of codes administration or other appropriate director. The liability of the surety shall continue to attach to work performed pursuant to any permit issued prior to the termination date of the bond, even if the noncomplying act occurs after the termination date of the bond. The liability of the surety for any and all claims, suits or actions under this bond shall not exceed the bond penalty. Regardless of the number of years this bond may remain in force, the liability of the surety shall not be cumulative and the aggregate liability of the surety for any and all claims, suits or actions under this bond shall not exceed the face amount. The bond shall be issued by a United States treasury listed corporate surety or a Tennessee domestic insurance company, on forms provided by the department of codes administration or other appropriate department.

It shall be the duty of every person, firm or corporation desiring to register with the department of codes administration or other appropriate department under this section to secure the required contractor's business license from the municipality or county.

Contractors with multiple trades or contractors involved in the construction, repair or alteration of more than one (1) structure in the municipality or county may provide one (1) fifty thousand dollar ($50,000) bond to meet the requirements of this section.

The bond shall be referenced by a standard form legal agreement, approved by the city or county attorney.

This section shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any municipality or county.

This section shall not apply to nonprofit housing ministries that, through volunteer labor and donations of money and materials, build and rehabilitate houses with the help of the homeowner families.

This section shall not be construed to extend the amount of time a contractor is liable under current law regarding construction, erection, alteration, repair, removal or demolition of any building or structure.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to or alter or affect any municipality, county or metropolitan government that, on June 22, 2005, has similar or more stringent requirements than those required in this section relative to bonding requirements and insuring that a contractor secures the required business license from the municipality, county or metropolitan government.

Acts 2005, ch. 489, §§ 1-10.

62-6-138. Prelicensing general contractor education courses or workshops.

All prelicensing courses designed to assist an applicant in taking an examination as required by the board must be approved by the board before accepting applicants.

A prelicensing general contractor education course or workshop shall be qualified for approval, if the board determines that it:

Constitutes an organized program of learning, including a symposium, that contributes directly to the professional competency of the licensee;

Is related to the practice of general contracting;

Is conducted by individuals considered experts in the subject matter of the program by reason of education, training or experience; and

Is accompanied by a paper, manual or written outline that substantially describes the subject matter of the program.

The board or its representative shall be admitted to prelicensing general contractor education courses at no charge, in order to monitor the persons present, the content of the course and supporting paperwork.

The person or firm conducting prelicensing general contractor education courses shall apply to the board for renewal of approval of the courses every three (3) years.

The board may charge a fee for reviewing and approving prelicensing general contractor education courses; provided, that the fee shall not be greater than that necessary to carry out this section.

The director of the board, acting on behalf of the board, is authorized to issue citations against persons acting in the capacity of or engaging in the business of conducting prelicensing general contractor education courses without approval of the board as required by this section. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the basis of the citation. Each citation shall contain an order to cease all violations of this part and an assessment of a civil penalty in an amount no less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to specify those conditions necessary to the issuance of a citation and the range of penalties for violations of this part.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to effectuate this section.

Acts 2006, ch. 657, §§ 1, 2.

62-6-139. Posting of disciplinary action on board's website — Advertising campaigns.

When the board disciplines a contractor, home improvement services provider as defined by § 39-14-154(a) or home improvement contractor, the board shall post the following information on its website:

The name of the contractor, home improvement services provider or home improvement contractor, together with the specific license and license number held by such person, or if such contractor, home improvement contractor or home improvement services provider is not licensed, information stating such;

The violation or type of violation; and

The date and type of penalty imposed.

The posting made pursuant to subsection (a) shall be made within thirty (30) days of the board's action and shall be retained on the website until there is a three-year period from the date of the contractor's, home improvement contractor's or home improvement services provider's last discipline in which the contractor, home improvement contractor or home improvement services provider has not been disciplined by the board.

In addition to posting such information on its website, to the extent funds are available, the board shall conduct advertising campaigns to inform the public of this section as well as educating the public as to the identity of home improvement services providers who have been convicted of violations of § 39-14-154 and the status of such provider's license.

Acts 2010, ch. 1055, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1055, § 7 provided that the act shall apply to any contract for home improvement services entered into on or after July 1, 2010.